en: Clover honeys
fr: Miels de trèfle
hr: Medovi od djeteline
nl: Klaverhoningen

fr: Miels crémeux
nl: Zachte honingen

en: Acacia honeys
de: Akazienhonige
es: Mieles de acacia
fr: Miels d’acacia
hr: Bagremovi medovi
it: Miele di acacia
nl: Acaciahoningen
sv: Akacia honung
zh: 洋槐蜜

en: Cherry blossom honeys
fr: Miels de cerisier
hr: Medovi trešnjinog cvijeta
lt: Medus iš vyšnių žiedų

en: Citrus honeys
de: Zitrusfruchthonige
fr: Miels d’agrumes
hr: Citrusni medovi
it: Miele di agrumi
nl: Citrusvruchtenhoningen

en: Orange blossom honeys
de: Orangenbaumhonige
es: Mieles de azahar, Mieles de naranjo
fr: Miels d’oranger, Miel d’oranger
hr: Medovi od narančinog cvijeta
it: Miele di arancio
lt: Medus iš apelsinų žiedų
nl: Sinaasappelbloesemhoningen

fr: Miels de citronnier
de: Zitronenbaumhonige
it: Miele di limone
nl: Citroenbloesemhoningen

fr: Miels de mandarinier
de: Mandarinenbaumhonige
nl: Mandarijnbloesemhoningen

en: Eucalyptus honeys
de: Eukalyptushonige
es: Mieles de eucaliptus
fr: Miels d'eucalyptus
hr: Medovi od eukaliptusa
it: Miele di eucalipto
nl: Eucalyptushoningen

en: Manuka honeys
es: Mieles de manuka
fr: Miels de manuka
hr: Manuka medovi
it: Miele di manuka
nl: Manukahoningen

en: Ulmo blossom honeys
fr: Miels d'ulmo, Miels de Eucryphia cordifolia
hr: Ulmo cvjetni medovi
nl: Honingen van de Eucryphia cordifolia

en: Cornflower honeys
fr: Miels de bleuet
hr: Medovi od različka
nl: Korenbloemenhoningen

en: Heather honeys
es: Mieles de brezo
fr: Miels de bruyère
hr: Medovi od vrijeska
nl: Heidehoningen

fr: Miels de bruyère blanche, Miels de bruyère arborescente, Miels de bruyère en arbre, Miels d'Erica arborea
nl: Boomheidehoningen

fr: Miels de bruyère callune, Miels de Callune, Miel de bruyère commune, Miel de Calluna vulgaris
it: Miele di calluna
nl: Stuikheidehoningen

en: Chestnut honey
de: Kastanienhonig
es: Mieles de castaño
fi: kastanjaöljy
fr: Miels de châtaignier
hr: Kestenov med
it: Miele di castagno
nl: Kastanjebloesemhoningen

en: Oak Honeys
bg: Дъбов мед
fr: Miels de chêne
hr: Hrastovi medovi
hu: Tölgy mézek
it: Miele di melata di quercia
nl: Eikenhoningen

fr: Miels de colza
it: Miele di colza
nl: Koolzaadbloesemhoningen

en: Honey from coniferous trees
fr: Miels de conifères
hr: Med od crnogoričnog drveća
nl: Conifeerhoningen

en: Pine honeys
bg: Боров мед
fr: Miels de pin
hr: Borovi medovi
nl: Pijnboomhoningen